California statutes. Public Contract Code
21202.

The board shall advertise by three insertions in a daily newspaper of general circulation or two insertions in a weekly newspaper of general circulation published in the district inviting sealed proposals for the construction of the work before any contract shall be made therefor, and may let by contract separately any part of the work. The board shall require the successful bidder to file with the board good and sufficient bonds to be approved by the board conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract and upon the payment of the claims for labor and material in connection therewith. The board may reject any and all bids.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21203.

If all proposals are rejected or no proposals are received pursuant to advertisement, or where the estimated cost of the work does not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), or where the work consists of channel protection, maintenance work, or emergency work, the board, by unanimous vote of all members present, may, without advertising for bids, have the work done by force account. In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050). The district may purchase in the open market, without advertising for bids, materials and supplies for use in any work either under contract or by force account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 803, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

21204.

The provisions of this section have no application to a contract entered into with the United States under the authority of Section 3 of this act, or to a contract authorized by a vote of the electorate of the district or zone.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 88. Sacramento County Water Agency [21210. - 21212.]

21210.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Sacramento County Water Agency, as provided for in Chapter 10 of the Statutes of the 1952 First Extraordinary Session.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21211.

The agency shall have the power to make contracts, employ labor and to do all acts necessary for the full exercise of its purposes and powers. The board of directors of the agency may cause construction or other work to be performed or carried out by contracts or by the agency under its own superintendents as hereinafter provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21212.

(a) All contracts for the construction of any unit of work, except as provided in this article, estimated to cost in excess of three thousand dollars ($3,000), shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder in the manner provided in this article. The board of directors of the agency shall advertise pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code in a newspaper of general circulation published in the agency’s jurisdiction inviting sealed proposals for the construction of the work before any contract is made, and may let by contract separately any part of the work. The board shall require the successful bidder to file with the board good and sufficient bonds to be approved by the board conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract and
 upon the payment of any claims for labor and material and containing the terms and conditions set forth in Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000) of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code and to be subject to the provisions of that title. The board shall also have the right to reject any bid, in which case the board may advertise for new bids.

(b) In the event no proposals are received pursuant to advertisement, or where the estimated cost of the work does not exceed three thousand dollars ($3,000), or the work consists of emergency work, the board of directors, by unanimous vote of all members present, may, without advertising for bids, have the work done by force account. In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(c) The agency may purchase in the open market without
 advertisement for bids, materials and supplies for use in any work either under contract or by force account.

(d) The provisions of this section have no application to a contract entered into with the United States under the authority of Section 6 of Chapter 10 of the Statutes of the 1952 First Extraordinary Session, or to a contract authorized by a vote of the electorate of the agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 70.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 89. Vallejo Flood and Wastewater District [21220. - 21221.]

21220.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Vallejo Flood and Wastewater District, as provided for in Chapter 17 of the Statutes of the 1952 First Extraordinary Session.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 387, Sec. 15.   (SB 205)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

21221.

In all work of improvement or repair of any of the works or property of the district and in the furnishing of materials or supplies therefor, when the expenditures exceed four thousand dollars ($4,000), the work shall be done by contract, and shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder, after notice by publication in the district pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code and by posting the notice for at least five days at or near the door of the meeting place
 of the board of trustees prior to the date set for opening bids; the notices shall distinctly state the work contemplated or the materials or supplies required therefor; provided the board of trustees may reject any bid presented and readvertise and post in their discretion, and provided further, that the board may declare and determine that in its opinion the work in question can be performed more economically by day labor or the materials or supplies can be furnished at a lower price in the open market, and they may proceed to have the work done or the materials purchased without further observance of the provisions of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 242, Sec. 13.   (SB 858)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 90. Marin County Flood Control and Water Conservation District [21230. - 21231.]

21230.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Marin County Flood Control and Water Conservation District, as provided for in Chapter 666 of the Statutes of 1953.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21231.

Any improvement or unit of work when the cost, according to the estimate of the engineer, will exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), shall be done by contract let to the lowest responsible bidder or bidders in the manner provided in this article. The board shall first determine whether the contract will be let as a single unit, or will be divided into severable parts, or both, according to the best interests of the district. The board shall call for bids and advertise the call pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code in the district, inviting sealed proposals for the construction or performance of the improvement or before any contract is made. The call for bids shall state whether the work is to be performed as a unit or shall be divided into separate specific
 parts, or both, as stated in the call. The board may let the work by single contract or it may divide the work into severable parts by separate contracts, as stated in the call, according to the best interests of the district. The board shall require the successful bidder or bidders to file with the board good and sufficient bonds to be approved by the board conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract and upon the payment of their claims for labor and material, the bonds to contain the terms and conditions set forth in Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000) of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code and to be subject to the provisions of that title. The board shall also have the right to reject any bid. In the event no proposals are received pursuant to advertisement, or the estimated cost of the work does not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), or the work consists of channel protection, maintenance work, or emergency work, the board of supervisors may, without advertising for bids, have the
 work done by day labor, under the direction of the board, by contract, or by a combination of the two. In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050). The district may acquire in the open market without advertising for bids, materials, equipment, and supplies for use in any work or for any other purpose; provided, however, that materials and supplies for use in any new construction work or improvement, except work referred to in the preceding sentence, may not be purchased if the cost exceeds five thousand dollars ($5,000), without advertising for bids and awarding the contract to the lowest responsible bidder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 71.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 91. Contra Costa County Storm Drainage District [21240. - 21241.]

21240.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Contra Costa County Storm Drainage District, as provided for in Chapter 1532 of the Statutes of 1953.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21241.

All contracts for any improvement or unit of work when the cost, according to the estimate of the engineer, will exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000), shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder or bidders in the manner provided in this article. The board shall first determine whether the contract shall be let as a single unit or shall be divided into severable parts, or both, according to the best interests of the zone. The board shall call for bids and advertise the call pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code in the district inviting sealed proposals for the construction or performance of the improvement or work before any contract is made. The call for bids shall state whether the work is to be performed as a unit or shall be divided into severable
 specific parts, or both, as stated in the call. The board may let the work by single contract or it may divide the work into severable parts by separate contracts, as stated in the call, according to the best interests of the district. The board shall require the successful bidder or bidders to file with the board good and sufficient bonds to be approved by the board conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract and upon the payment of their claims for labor and material, the bonds to contain the terms and conditions set forth in Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000) of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code and to be subject to the provisions of that title. The board shall also have the right to reject any bid. In the event no proposals are received pursuant to advertisement, or the estimated cost of the work does not exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000), or the work consists of emergency work, the board of supervisors may, without advertising for bids, have the work done by day labor, under
 the direction of the board, by contract, or by a combination of the two. In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050). The board may acquire in the open market, without advertising for bids, materials, equipment, and supplies for use in any work or for any other purpose; provided, however, that materials and supplies for use in any new construction work or improvement, except work referred to in the preceding sentence, may not be purchased if the cost exceeds two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), without advertising for bids and awarding the contract to the lowest responsible bidder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 72.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 92. San Benito County Water Conservation and Flood Control District [21250. - 21251.]

21250.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the San Benito County Water Conservation and Flood Control District, as provided for in Chapter 1598 of the Statutes of 1953.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21251.

(a) (1) All contracts for any improvement or unit of work, if the cost according to the estimate of the engineer will exceed thirty thousand dollars ($30,000), shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder or bidders as provided in this article. The board shall first determine whether the contract shall be let as a single unit or divided into severable parts, or both.

(2) All contracts for any improvement or unit of work, if the cost according to the estimate of the engineer is thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) or less, may be let without advertising for bids in accordance with procedures adopted by the board.

(b) The board shall call for bids and advertise the call pursuant to Section 6063 of the Government Code in the district, inviting sealed proposals for the construction or performance of the improvement or work before any contract is made. The call for bids shall state whether the work is to be performed as one unit or divided into severable specific parts.

(c) The work may be let under a single contract or several contracts, or both, as stated in the call. The board shall require the successful bidder or bidders to file with the board good and sufficient bonds to be approved by the board conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract and upon the payment of their claims for labor and material. The bonds shall comply with Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000) of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code. The board may reject any bid.

(d) If all proposals are
 rejected or no proposals are received, or the estimated cost of the work does not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), or the work consists of channel protection, maintenance work, or emergency work, the board may have the work done by force account without advertising for bids. In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(e) The district may purchase in the open market, without advertising for bids, materials and supplies for use in any work either under contract or by force account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 73.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 93. Del Norte County Flood Control District [21260. - 21261.]

21260.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Del Norte County Flood Control District, as provided for in Chapter 166 of the Statutes of 1955.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21261.

All contracts for any improvement or unit of work when the cost, according to the estimate of the engineer, will exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000), shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder or bidders in the manner provided in this article. The board shall first determine whether the contract shall be let as a single unit for the work, or shall be divided into severable parts, or both, according to the best interests of the district. The board shall call for bids and advertise the call pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code in the district inviting sealed proposals for the construction or performance of the improvement or work before any contract is made. The call for bids shall state whether the work is to be performed as a unit or shall be divided
 into severable specific parts, or both, as stated in the call. The board may let the work by single contract or it may divide the work into severable parts by separate contracts, as stated in the call, according to the best interests of the district. The board shall require the successful bidder or bidders to file with the board good and sufficient bonds to be approved by the board conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract and upon the payment of their claims for labor and material, the bonds to contain the terms and conditions set forth in Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000) of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code and to be subject to the provisions of that title. The board shall also have the right to reject any bid. In the event all proposals are rejected or no proposals are received pursuant to advertisement, or the estimated cost of the work does not exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000), or the work consists of channel protection, maintenance work, or emergency work, the board of
 supervisors may, without advertising for bids, have the work done by force account. In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050). The district may purchase in the open market, without advertising for bids, materials and supplies for use in any work either under contract or by force account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 74.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 94. Santa Barbara County Flood Control and Water Conservation Districts [21270. - 21271.]

21270.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Santa Barbara County Flood Control and Water Conservation Districts, as provided for in Chapter 1057 of the Statutes of 1955.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21271.

All improvement and units of work to be performed by or for the district shall be performed in accordance with the following procedures and requirements:

(a) If the work consists of the protection or maintenance of channels, storm drains, dams or other flood control works, or emergency work, the board of directors may, without advertising for bids therefor, have the work done by day labor under the direction of the board, by contract, or by a combination of the two. In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(b) If the work consists
 of the construction of new flood control channels, storm drains, dams, or other unit or units of work, and if the cost of the work, according to the estimate of the engineer, will exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000), and if the work is not the type of work referred to in subdivision (a) or (c) of this section, the new construction shall be performed under a contract or contracts which shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder or bidders in the manner provided in subdivision (d) of this section.

(c) If the work consists of the maintenance or alteration of existing facilities, including electrical, painting, and roofing work, and if the cost of labor and materials for the work according to the engineer’s estimate, will exceed three thousand five hundred dollars ($3,500), and if the work is not the type of work referred to in subdivision (a) or (b) of this section, the maintenance and alteration work shall be performed under a contract or
 contracts which shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder or bidders in the manner provided in subdivision (d) of this section.

(d) The board shall first determine whether the work shall be let as a single unit or shall be divided into severable parts, or both, according to the best interests of the district. The board shall call for bids and advertise the call pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code in the district inviting sealed proposals for the construction or performance of the work before any contract is made. The call for bids shall state whether the work is to be performed as a unit or shall be divided into severable, specific parts, or both, as stated in the call. The board may let the work by single contract or it may divide the work into severable parts by separate contracts, as stated in the call, according to the best interests of the district. The board shall require the successful bidder or bidders to file with the
 board good and sufficient bond to be approved by the board conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract and upon the payment of the claims for labor and material. The faithful performance bond shall contain the terms and conditions as the board may specify, and the payment bond shall contain the terms and conditions set forth in, and shall be subject to, the provisions of Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000) of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code. If the work to be performed on behalf of the district does not involve an expenditure of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) or more, the district may require a faithful performance bond or a payment bond. The board shall also have the right to reject any bid.

(e) If no proposals are received pursuant to advertisement, or if the estimated cost of work of the type referred to in subdivision (b) of this section does not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or if the estimated cost of
 work of the type referred to in subdivision (c) of this section does not exceed three thousand five hundred dollars ($3,500), the board of directors may, without advertising for bids, have the work done by day labor, under the direction of the board, by contract, or by combination of the two. If any change or alteration in a contract awarded under the provisions of this section for work of the type referred to in subdivision (b) or (c) is deemed necessary and the cost does not exceed 10 percent of the original contract price, the board may authorize the contractor to proceed with the change or alteration without the formality of obtaining bids.

(f) Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions, the district shall have the power to acquire in the open market, and may authorize the Purchasing Agents of the County of Santa Barbara to acquire in the open market, without advertising for bids, materials, equipment, and supplies for use in any work or for
 any other purpose; provided, however, that materials and supplies for use in any new construction work or improvement, except work referred to in subdivision (a) of this section, may not be purchased without advertising for bids and awarding the contract to the lowest responsible bidder if the cost exceeds two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), unless the purchase is made by the county purchasing agent at the request of the district, in which case the cost shall not exceed six thousand five hundred dollars ($6,500).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 75.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 95. Santa Cruz County Flood Control and Water Conservation District [21280. - 21297.]

21280.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Santa Cruz County Flood Control and Water Conservation District, as provided for in Chapter 1489 of the Statutes of 1955.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21281.

All contracts for the construction of any unit of work, except as provided in Sections 21292 and 21298, estimated to cost in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000) shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder in the manner hereinafter provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21282.

Materials and supplies for use in any new construction work or improvement, may not be purchased if the cost thereof exceeds five thousand dollars ($5,000), without advertising for bids and awarding the contract therefor to the lowest responsible bidder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21283.

The board shall adopt plans, specifications, strain sheets, and working details for the work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21284.

The board shall cause an advertisement for bids for the performance of the work on the purchase of materials to be published in the county pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code, at least 10 days before the day set for opening bids.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21285.

All bidders shall be afforded opportunity to examine the plans, specifications, strain sheets and working details.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21286.

All proposals or bids offered shall be accompanied by a cashier’s or certified check payable to the district, for an amount which shall not be less than 10 percent of the aggregate of the proposal, or by a bond for that amount and so payable, signed by the bidder and two sureties, who shall justify, in double that amount, before any officer competent to administer an oath, and over and above all statutory exemptions, or by a corporate surety bond, to the satisfaction and approval of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21287.

The board shall award the contract to the lowest responsible bidder, and the person to whom the contract is awarded shall perform the work in accordance with the plans, specifications, strain sheets, and working details, unless the contract is modified by a four-fifths vote of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21288.

The person to whom the contract is awarded shall execute a bond to be approved by the board for the faithful performance of the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21289.

If the board is advised by its engineer, or by the county surveyor or engineer, that any facility can be constructed or repaired for a sum less than the lowest responsible bid, it may reject all bids and order the work done by day’s work under the supervision and direction of the county surveyor or engineer or its engineer as determined by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21290.

(a) By the unanimous consent of the whole board in cases of emergency, except for compliance with subdivision (b), the board may proceed at once to replace or repair any and all structures without adopting the plans, specifications, strain sheets, or working details or giving notice for bids to let contracts. The work may be done by day labor under the direction of the board, by contract, or by a combination of the two. If the work is done wholly or in part by contract, the contractor shall be paid the actual cost of material and labor expended by him or her in doing the work, plus not more than 15 percent to cover all profits, supervisions, use of machinery and tools, and other expenses. No more than the lowest current market prices shall be paid for materials.

(b) In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 803, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

21291.

The plans and specifications adopted by the board for the erection, alteration, construction, or repair of any public building or other public structure shall not be altered or changed in any manner which increases its cost, except by a vote of two-thirds of the members of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21292.

Whenever the board enters into a contract for the erection, construction, alteration, or repair of any public building or other structure, the contract shall not be altered or changed in any manner, except by order adopted by a vote of two-thirds of the board, and the consent of the contractor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21293.

If any change or alteration of the contract is ordered, it shall be specified in writing and the cost agreed upon between the board and the contractor. If the cost so agreed upon:

(a) Does not exceed the amount specified in Section 113, or

(b) Does not exceed 10 percent of the original contract price,
the board may authorize the contractor to proceed with the change or alteration without the formality of obtaining bids therefor.

No change or alteration shall be authorized the amount of which is within the limitation specified in subdivision (b) and in excess of the limitation specified in subdivision (a) except by four-fifths vote of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21294.

If the cost of the works is reduced by reason of any modification of the contract an adjustment shall be made with the district therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21295.

Personal property may be purchased in the manner provided therefor for the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21296.

The provisions of this article do not apply to work to be performed by others pursuant to Section 21297.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21297.

(a) It may make and enter into contracts with the United States, the State of California, any political subdivision, county, municipality, district, agency, or mandatory of the State of California or of the United States and any department, board, bureau, or commission of the State of California or the United States, or any person, firm, association, or corporation, jointly or severally, for the acquisition of property or rights or the construction, maintenance, and operation in whole or in part of any or all works and improvements provided for in this act.

(b) It may lease or rent to or from any of the parties named in subdivision (a) any property or rights necessary, in the opinion of the board, to accomplish or carry out any of the work or improvement or the maintenance thereof herein provided and under such terms and conditions as may be agreed upon between the parties.

(c) It may receive and accept any and all contributions in labor, material, or money from any of the parties named in subdivision (a), to be applied to the work or improvement herein provided for.

(d) It may cooperate and contract with the United States under the Federal Reclamation Act of June 17, 1902, and all acts amendatory thereof or supplementary thereto or any other act of Congress heretofore or hereafter enacted permitting cooperation or contract for the purposes of construction of works, whether for irrigation, drainage, or flood control, or for the acquisition, purchase, extension, operation, or maintenance of such works, or for a water supply for any purposes, or for the assumption as principal or guarantor of indebtedness to the United States, or for carrying out any of the purposes of the district, and to carry out and perform the terms of any contract so made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 96. San Joaquin County Flood Control and Water Conservation District [21310. - 21311.]

21310.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the San Joaquin County Flood Control and Water Conservation District, as provided for in Chapter 46 of the Statutes of 1956.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21311.

(a) All contracts for any improvement or unit of work when the cost, according to the estimate of the engineer, will exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000), shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder or bidders in the manner provided in this article. The board shall first determine whether the contract shall be let as a single unit, or shall be divided into severable parts, or both, according to the best interests of the district. The board shall call for bids and advertise the call by three insertions in a daily newspaper of general circulation or by two insertions in a weekly newspaper of general circulation printed and published in the district inviting sealed proposals for the construction or performance of the improvement or work before any
 contract is made. The call for bids shall state whether the work is to be performed as a unit or shall be divided into severable specific parts, or both, as stated in the call. The board may let the work by single contract for the whole as a unit or it may divide the work into severable parts by separate contracts, as stated in the call, according to the best interests of the district. The board shall require the successful bidder or bidders to file with the board good and sufficient bonds to be approved by the board conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract and upon the payment of their claims for labor and material, the bonds to contain the terms and conditions set forth in Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000) of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code and to be subject to the provisions of that title. The board shall also have the right to reject any bid.

(b) In the event no proposals are received pursuant to advertisement,
 or the estimated cost of the work does not exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000), or the work consists of channel protection, maintenance work, or emergency work, the board of supervisors may, without advertising for bids, have the work done by day labor, under the direction of the board, by contract, or by a combination of the two. In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(c) The district may acquire in the open market, without advertising for bids, materials, equipment, and supplies for use in any work or for any other purpose; provided, however, that materials and supplies for use in any new construction work or improvement, except work referred to in subdivision (b), shall not be purchased if the cost exceeds two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), without advertising for bids and awarding the contract to the lowest responsible
 bidder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 76.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 97. Placer County Water Agency [21320. - 21322.]

21320.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Placer County Water Agency, as provided for in Chapter 1234 of the Statutes of 1957.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21321.

(a) All contracts for any improvement or unit of work, when the cost according to the estimate of the engineer will exceed thirty thousand dollars ($30,000), shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder or bidders as provided in this article. The board shall first determine whether the contract shall be let as a single unit, or divided into severable parts. The board shall advertise for bids by three insertions in a daily newspaper of general circulation or by two insertions in a weekly newspaper of general circulation printed and published in the agency’s jurisdiction, inviting sealed proposals for the construction or performance of the improvement or work. The call for bids shall state whether the work shall be performed in one unit or divided
 into parts. The work may be let under a single contract or several contracts, as stated in the call.

The board shall require the successful bidders to file with the board good and sufficient bonds to be approved by the board conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract and upon the payment of their claims for labor and material. The bonds shall comply with Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000) of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code.

(b) The board may reject any bid. In the event all proposals are rejected or no proposals are received, or the estimated cost of the work does not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), or the work consists of channel protection, maintenance, or emergency work, the board may have the work done by force account without advertising for bids. In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5
 (commencing with Section 22050). In the event that no proposals are received, or if only one responsive proposal is received, the board may negotiate a contract for construction or performance of the work or improvement or substantially similar work or improvement. However, if only one responsive proposal is received, the contract must be negotiated with the bidder.

(c) The agency may purchase in the open market without advertising for bids, materials and supplies for use in any work, either under contract or by force account.

(d) Sections 4300 to 4305, inclusive, of the Government Code do not apply to the agency’s Middle Fork American River Project.

(e) This section applies to all proposals or contracts whether or not received or entered into prior to the effective date of the amendment of this provision made at the
 1963 Regular Session of the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 77.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------

21322.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 21321, contracts may be let for work without advertising in cases of significant emergency as determined by the board. Cases of significant emergency include, but are not limited to:

(1) States of emergency as specified in Section 8558 of the Government Code.

(2) When emergency repair or replacement is necessary to permit the continued operation or service of the agency.

(3) When the emergency work is necessary to avoid danger to life or property.

Any action taken under this section must be authorized by a unanimous vote of the board members present. Additionally, the board must find, based on substantial evidence set forth in the minutes of its meeting, that the emergency work is necessary for the stated reasons.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 687, Sec. 1.   Effective October 4, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 98. Tehama County Flood Control and Water Conservation District [21330. - 21331.]

21330.
